District of Columbia statutes.
8-1774.15

Discount program for low-income gas customers.

The Commission shall establish, by order, a discount program for low-income gas customers in the District. The Commission shall establish the eligibility, funding, and administrative guidelines for the program; provided, that the program shall not be funded from existing District funds, District revenue sources, or District assessments.

Oct. 22, 2008, D.C. Law 17-250, § 215
as added Feb. 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-155, § 2102(c), 61 DCR 9990
For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 2102(c) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-377, July 14, 2014, 61 DCR 7598, 20 STAT 3696).
For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 2102(c) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-449, October 10, 2014, 61 DCR 10915, 20 STAT 4188).
For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 2102(c) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-566, January 9, 2015, 62 DCR 884, 21 STAT 541).